Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.070

Hearing—Order adjudicating public use.

At the time and place appointed for hearing the petition, or to which the hearing may have been adjourned, if the court has satisfactory proof that all parties interested in the lands, real estate, premises or other property described in the petition have been duly served with the notice, and is further satisfied by competent proof that the contemplated use for which the lands, real estate, premises, or other property are sought to be appropriated is really necessary for the public use of the state, it shall make and enter an order, to be recorded in the minutes of the court, and which order shall be final unless appellate review thereof is sought within five days after entry thereof, adjudicating that the contemplated use for which the lands, real estate, premises or other property are sought to be appropriated is really a public use of the state.

[ 1988 c 202 s 6; 1971 c 81 s 33; 1955 c 213 s 2. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 98 s 1, part; 1891 c 74 s 4, part; RRS s 894, part.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Writ procedure superseded by RAP 2.1, 2.2(a)(4), 5.2, 18.22.

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.